Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1832
Appeal; procedure.

All determinations, decisions, and awards made by the committee or any hearing officer may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 32;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 30;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 180.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

This section covers appeal to district court by the children of a crime victim from a denial of their application to the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Board. Lambert v. Nebraska Cr. Vict. Rep. Bd., 214 Neb. 817, 336 N.W.2d 320 (1983).